Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions
27-1-25.
Interference with arrest or performance of game warden’s duties.

It shall be unlawful for any person to resist or interfere by force, menace, threat, or in any other manner with any arrest for violation of any wildlife law. It shall also be unlawful for any person to refuse to go with a game warden or deputy game warden after such an arrest has been made or to interfere with such warden in the performance of his duty.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 20; Code 1933, § 45-209, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game warden” for “conservation ranger” in two places in the second sentence of this Code section.

Cross references.

Obstructing or hindering law enforcement officers in discharge of duties generally, §

16-10-24

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, “such warden” was substituted for “such ranger” near the end of the second sentence.

27-1-25.1.
Failure or refusal to bring motor vehicle or boat to a stop when ordered to do so.

It shall be unlawful for any person operating any motor vehicle or power boat to fail or refuse to bring such vehicle or boat to a stop, or otherwise to flee or attempt to elude a pursuing peace officer who is in uniform, who prominently displays his badge of office, and who is authorized to enforce this title, when given a visible or audible signal to bring such vehicle or boat to a stop. An officer may give such visible or audible signal by use of his hand or voice or by use of an emergency light or siren.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-1-25.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1729, § 2.

27-1-26.
[Reserved] Impersonation of conservation officer.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1059, § 2, effective April 7, 1986.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 27/HB 79, reserved the designation of this Code section, effective April 24, 2013.

27-1-27.
Damaging or destroying department property.

It shall be unlawful for any person to take, damage, or destroy any wildlife, equipment, gate, building, or other property belonging to or under the custody and control of the department or any of its employees or agents.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 20; Code 1933, § 45-212, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-1-28.
Taking of nongame species.

Except as otherwise provided by law, rule, or regulation, it shall be unlawful to hunt, trap, fish, take, possess, or transport any nongame species of wildlife, except that the following species may be taken by any method except those specifically prohibited by law or regulation:

Rats;

Mice;

Coyotes;

Armadillos;

Groundhogs;

Beaver;

Fresh-water turtles;

Poisonous snakes;

Frogs;

Spring lizards;

Fiddler crabs;

Fresh-water crayfish;

Fresh-water mussels; and

Nutria.

The nongame species enumerated in subsection (a) of this Code section may be taken by any method except those specifically prohibited by law or regulation.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to authorize the taking of any species which is protected under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973, P.L. 93-205, as amended, or under any state law which has as its purpose the protection of endangered or threatened species.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-202, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 15; Ga. L. 1981, p. 798, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1729, § 3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 537, § 1.

U.S. Code.

The federal Endangered Species Act of 1973, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

16 U.S.C. § 1531

et seq.

27-1-29.
Sale or purchase of game.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, it shall be unlawful for any person in this state to sell or to purchase any game species or parts thereof, provided that authorized personnel of the department and of any federal agency may buy or sell such game species or parts thereof for the sole purpose of obtaining evidence of violations of the wildlife laws and regulations.

History.

Ga. L. 1911, p. 137, § 12; Ga. L. 1916, p. 114, § 2; Code 1933, § 45-302; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 53; Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 16; Code 1933, § 45-205, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, § 15.

27-1-30.
Disturbing or destroying wildlife habitats.

Except as otherwise provided by law or regulation, it shall be unlawful to disturb, mutilate, or destroy the dens, holes, or homes of any wildlife; to blind wildlife with lights; or to use explosives, chemicals, electrical or mechanical devices, or smokers of any kind in order to drive such wildlife out of such habitats.

History.

Ga. L. 1911, p. 137, § 17; Code 1933, § 45-322; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1005, § 1; Ga. L. 1952, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 62; Code 1933, § 45-207, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1629, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 20; Ga. L. 2014, p. 381, § 1/SB 322.

27-1-31.
Unlawful possession or use of wildlife; unlawful concealment.

It shall be unlawful for any person to make use of or possess any wildlife or parts thereof which he knows or reasonably should have known have been taken or possessed contrary to any of the wildlife laws, rules, and regulations.

It shall also be unlawful for any person to conceal the taking or possessing of wildlife by himself or any other person, whether by accident or otherwise, if the person concealing the taking or possessing knows or reasonably should have known that the wildlife has been taken or possessed illegally.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 925, § 1; Code 1933, § 45-203, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-1-32.
Hiring of another to take wildlife contrary to law.

It shall be unlawful for any person to hire another to take or possess wildlife in violation of the wildlife laws, rules, and regulations.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 54; Code 1933, § 45-206, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-1-33.
Noncompliance with laws while on fishing area, fish hatchery, natural area, or wildlife management area; acts constituting criminal trespass.

It shall be unlawful to enter upon or to hunt, trap, or fish on any public fishing area, fish hatchery, or natural area, or wildlife management area owned or operated by the department except in compliance with all applicable laws and all rules and regulations promulgated by the board, including, but not limited to, any law, rule, or regulation relating to seasons or bag limits or requiring a special permit.

Any person who enters upon or who hunts, traps, or fishes on any public hunting or fishing area, fish hatchery, or natural area or any game management area owned or operated by the department in violation of this Code section commits the offense of criminal trespass.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-213, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 16; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1729, § 4; Ga. L. 1987, p. 179, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1552, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 980, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1013, § 4; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1352, § 4/HB 475; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 1/SB 72.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in subsection (a), inserted a comma following “promulgated by the board” in the middle of the first sentence, and deleted the former second sentence, which read: “Further, it shall be unlawful for any person except those specifically excluded by law to hunt on a wildlife management area without a valid wildlife management area license as authorized by Code Section 27-2-23.”

Cross references.

Prohibition against certain acts at a park, historic site, or recreational area, §

12-3-10

.

Prohibition against hunting while intoxicated, §

27-3-7

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 179, § 6, not codified by the General Assembly, set forth the legislative intent of that Act.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 1352, § 1/HB 475, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Feral Hog Control Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 1352, § 2/HB 475, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds that feral hogs are an invasive species in Georgia and are detrimental to the natural resources and agricultural production of the state.
Feral hogs cause significant damage to crops and wildlife habitat.
In addition, as carriers of communicable diseases, feral hogs pose a health risk to humans, livestock, companion animals, pets, and native wildlife.”

27-1-34.
Defenses not available in prosecutions for violations.

In any prosecution for the violation of any of the provisions of the wildlife laws, it shall not be a defense that the person taking, possessing, selling, transporting, or storing wildlife was mistaken as to the species, sex, age, size, or any other fact regarding such wildlife or that the person lacked criminal intent, it being one of the purposes of the wildlife laws to penalize recklessness resulting in the violation of the wildlife laws.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 52; Code 1933, § 45-204, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-1-35.
Jurisdiction of probate courts; summons.

The jurisdiction of the probate courts of the several counties of this state is enlarged and extended so that probate courts, acting by and through the judge or presiding officer, shall have the right and power to receive pleas of guilty and impose sentence upon defendants violating the provisions of this title.

When a person is arrested for any violation of the wildlife laws, the arresting officer may, at his discretion, choose to issue to the offender a summons to appear before a court of jurisdiction. Every such summons shall show:

That it is issued by authority of the department;

The name of the person summoned or, if the person to be summoned refuses to give his name or the officer serving the summons believes the name given is false or if the officer is for other cause unable to ascertain the correct name of the person to be summoned, a fictitious name plainly identified as such;

The offense with which the person being summoned is charged and the date and location of the alleged offense;

The location of the court and the day and hour at which he is summoned to appear;

That failure to so appear is a violation of Georgia laws and subject to prosecution;

The date the summons is served; and

The name and official designation of the officer serving it.

Every person so summoned shall appear at the place and on the date ordered except in cases where a bond has been posted in lieu of the summons or where the court has granted a continuance.

The officer serving a summons pursuant to this Code section shall, on or before the return date of the summons, deliver a copy thereof to the court before which it is returnable, or to the clerk of such court, and shall file any information and such affidavits as may be required with respect to the alleged offense.

Personal delivery of a summons to the persons charged shall constitute due and proper service of the summons; provided, however, that if the violation is for a vehicle parking violation involving an unattended vehicle, service may be made by placing the summons on the driver’s side of the windshield of the vehicle.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 20; Code 1933, § 45-215, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 980, § 3.

27-1-36.
Civil enforcement by department; disposition of penalties.

As an alternative to criminal enforcement pursuant to Code Section 27-1-38, the department, in order to enforce this title or any rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, may employ any one or any combination of the following methods:

Any person who violates any provisions of this title or any regulations or orders promulgated and administered thereunder shall be liable civilly for a penalty in an amount of up to $1,000.00 for each and every violation thereof, the penalty to be recoverable by a civil action brought in the name of the commissioner by the district attorney of the county in which the alleged violator resides. The commissioner on his motion may or upon complaint of any interested party charging a violation shall refer the matter directly to the district attorney of the county in which the alleged violator resides. The proceeds from all civil penalties arising from enforcement of the wildlife laws, regulations, and orders pursuant to this Code section shall be used in the manner prescribed in Code Section 27-1-14;

Whenever the commissioner determines that any person has violated any provision of this title or any regulations or orders promulgated under this title, the commissioner may issue an administrative order imposing a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000.00 for the violation. Any person who is aggrieved or adversely affected by any such order shall, upon petition within 30 days after the issuance of such order, have a right to a hearing before an administrative law judge appointed by the Board of Natural Resources. The hearing before the administrative law judge shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” and the rules and regulations adopted by the board pursuant thereto. The decision of the administrative law judge shall constitute the final decision of the board and any party to the hearing, including the commissioner, shall have the right of judicial review thereof in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50; or

All civil penalties recovered by the department as provided in this Code section shall be paid into the state treasury. The commissioner may file in the superior court in the county in which the person under order resides or, if the person is a corporation, in the county in which the corporation maintains its principal place of business, or in the county in which the violation occurred, a certified copy of a final order of the commissioner or the administrative law judge unappealed from or of a final order of the administrative law judge affirmed upon appeal, whereupon the court shall render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties. The judgment shall have the same effect, and all proceedings in relation thereto shall thereafter be the same, as though the judgment had been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by the court.

The civil penalty prescribed in this Code section shall be concurrent with, alternative to, and cumulative of any and all other civil, criminal, or alternative rights, remedies, forfeitures, or penalties provided, allowed, or available to the commissioner with respect to any violation of this title and any regulations or orders promulgated pursuant thereto; provided, however, that in no instance shall the department be authorized to proceed against any person under both Code Section 27-1-38 and this Code section for any single violation of the wildlife laws, rules, and regulations.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-217, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 404, § 7; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 27; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 27.

27-1-37.
Administrative orders; emergency administrative orders; administrative review.

Whenever the department has reason to believe that a violation of any provision of this title, any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, or a condition of any permit issued thereunder has occurred or is occurring, the department may, in its discretion, issue an administrative order requiring the violator to take whatever corrective action the department deems necessary in order to obtain compliance within a period of time set forth in such order. Such order may also authorize the seizure of any wildlife or wild animal which the department determines is being or has been taken, imported, sold, transferred, or possessed in violation of this title, any regulation promulgated pursuant thereto, or a condition of any permit or license issued thereunder. Any such order issued by the department shall become final unless the person named therein files with the department a written request for a hearing within 30 days after the order is served personally or by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery on such person.

In addition to taking the actions authorized in subsection (a) of this Code section, the department may issue an emergency administrative order for the purpose of authorizing any appropriate enforcement action including, but not limited to, the seizure of wildlife or wild animals; provided, however, that such emergency order must be supported by and have attached thereto an affidavit stating that the affiant has personal knowledge that immediate irreparable injury is likely to occur to wildlife or other natural resources, to wild animals, or to human beings. Any such emergency order issued by the department shall be effective immediately upon the issuance of the order. The person named in the order shall, upon written request within 30 days of the issuance of the order, be entitled to a hearing, the hearing to be held within ten days of receipt of the request.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to require the issuance of an administrative order or emergency administrative order to seize contraband or wildlife in accordance with this title.

The hearing reviewing an administrative order or an emergency administrative order shall be conducted by an administrative law judge appointed by the Board of Natural Resources. The hearing before the administrative law judge shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” and the rules and regulations adopted by the board pursuant thereto. The decision of the administrative law judge shall constitute the final decision of the board and any party to the hearing, including the department, shall have the right of judicial review thereof in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-122, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, § 14; Ga. L. 1984, p. 404, § 8; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 27; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to subsection (a) is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

27-1-38.
Penalty for violations of title.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, any person who violates any of the provisions of this title shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; provided, however, that unless otherwise specifically provided, any person who violates any of the provisions of this title or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant thereto relating to the possession or use of fishing gear on trawlers shall be a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and shall be fined $1,000.00 for the first offense, $3,000.00 for the second offense, and $5,000.00 for the third and each subsequent offense.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-216, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1232, § 1.

27-1-39.
Rules and regulations used to establish criminal violations.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, for purposes of establishing criminal violations of the rules and regulations promulgated by the Board of Natural Resources as provided in this title, the term “rules and regulations” means those rules and regulations of the Board of Natural Resources in force and effect on January 1, 2022.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-1-39

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1550, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1013, § 5; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1232, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 654, § 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 226, § 1/HB 338; Ga. L. 2008, p. 702, § 1/HB 239; Ga. L. 2010, p. 952, § 2/SB 474; Ga. L. 2012, p. 739, § 1/HB 869; Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 2/SB 136; Ga. L. 2014, p. 344, § 1/HB 783; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1056, § 2/SB 112; Ga. L. 2016, p. 432, § 3/HB 840; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 2/SB 72; Ga. L. 2020, p. 827, § 2-1/HB 998; Ga. L. 2021, p. 105, § 2-2/HB 362; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 27/HB 497; Ga. L. 2022, p. 308, § 2/HB 1233.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “January 1, 2016” for “January 1, 2015” at the end of this Code section. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “2019” for “2016” at the end of this Code section.

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 5, 2020, substituted “January 1, 2020” for “January 1, 2019” at the end of this Code section.

The 2021 amendments.

The first 2021 amendment, effective April 27, 2021, substituted “January 1, 2021” for “January 1, 2020” at the end of this Code section. The second 2021 amendment, effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in this Code section.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “January 1, 2022” for “January 1, 2021” at the end of this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 14/SB 136, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act “shall apply to all offenses occurring on and after May 15, 2013; provided, however, that for purposes of determining the number of prior convictions or pleas of nolo contendere pursuant to the felony provisions of paragraph (4) of subsection (m) of Code Section 52-7-12, only those offenses for which a conviction or a plea of nolo contendere is obtained on or after May 15, 2013, shall be considered.”

Ga. L. 2014, p. 344, § 5/HB 783, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on May 1, 2014, and shall apply to offenses occurring on or after such date.”

Ga. L. 2016, p. 432, § 6/HB 840, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2016, and shall apply to all offenses occurring on or after such date.”